Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,133
Apartment house, defined.

Apartment house shall mean any building which is occupied as the home or residence of three or more families or persons living independently of each other and doing their own cooking in the building, and such term shall include buildings containing three or more apartments.

Laws 1981, LB 296, § 2.